Washington statutes.
RCW 35.43.035

Creation of district outside city subject to review by boundary review board.

The creation of a local improvement district outside of the boundaries of a city or town to provide water or sewer facilities may be subject to potential review by a boundary review board under chapter 36.93 RCW.

[ 1989 c 84 s 30.]